Utah statutes.
78B-7-407.   Enforcement.

(1)  A law enforcement officer shall, without a warrant, arrest a person if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person has intentionally or knowingly violated a protective order issued under this part, regardless of whether the violation occurred in the presence of the officer.

(2)  A violation of a protective order issued under this part constitutes a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 179, 2013 General Session

